src/phonology/mrj-phon.twolc
!! !Vowel loss
"suffix-final vowel loss before subsequent suffix-initial vowel %{ыӹ%}:0" 
!! __@RULENAME@__  
  %{ыӹ%}:0 <=>    Cns %> [ %{ыӹØ%}: [ д %{ыӹ%}: м | м | ш ( т | к ) ]| (0:ы|0:ӹ) ж: ] _ %> [ Е2: [в|м|н|т|ш] | А2: ] ;
! Vow %> [ %{ыӹØ%}: ш [ т | к ] | ж: ] _ %> [ л | г | %{ыӹØ%}: ш | ш | д | Е2: [в|м|н|т|ш] | А2: ] ;

"Not SgNom for lat а:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
а:0 <=> Cns:+ _ %^А2ЫӸ:0 %> е  ;
        # [ Cns: | Vow: | %> ]+ Cns:+ _ %> [ ӹ: | ы: ] %> ;            

"Not SgNom for lat е:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
е:0 <=> 
        Cns:+ (ь) _ %> [ ӹ: | ы: ] %> ;            
!!€ варенье%>ӹ%>влӓ
!!€ варень0%>ӹ%>влӓ

!! !!Devoicing
"Onset consonant devoicing" 
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 ж:ш <=> [ :Cst ( :0 ) | ж ] ( %^ConsTransf:0 (Ь2: ) ) %> _ [ %{ыӹØ%}: | %{ыӹ%}: ] ;



!! !!DISALLOW

!"Disallow Е2:0 after Letters"
!!!! __@RULENAME@__  
!Е2:0 /<= Ltrs _ ;
